ko: 모형 로켓 Launch 또는 레일 추천: 1/4인치(6mm) 로드; 1/8인치(3mm) 로드; 3/16인치(5mm) 로드; 런칭 레일(1010); 런칭 레일(1515); 기타
es: Se recomienda Launch un cohete modelo con una varilla o riel de tamaño: Varilla de 1/4 pulg. (6 mm); Varilla de 1/8 pulg. (3 mm); Varilla de 3/16 pulg. (5 mm); Riel de lanzamiento (1010); Riel de lanzamiento (1515); Otro
fr: Taille recommandée de la tige ou du rail de lancement: Tige de 1/4 po (6 mm); Tige de 1/8 po (3 mm); Tige de 3/16 po (5 mm); Rail de lancement (1010); Rail de lancement (1515); Autre
nl: Modelraket aanbevolen lanceerstang- of railmaat: 1/4 inch (6 mm) stang; 1/8 inch (3 mm) stang; 3/16 inch (5 mm) stang; Lanceerrail (1010); Lanceerrail (1515); Overig
vi: Kích thước thanh phóng hoặc ray phóng được khuyến nghị cho mô hình tên lửa: Trục 1/4 in (6 mm); Trục 1/8 in (3 mm); Trục 3/16 in (5 mm); Thanh dẫn phóng (1010); Thanh dẫn phóng (1515); Khác
hr-HR: Preporučena veličina šipke za pokretanje ili šine za model rakete: Šipka od 1/4 in (6 mm); Šipka od 1/8 in (3 mm); Šipka od 3/16 in (5 mm); Lansirna tračnica (1010); Lansirna tračnica (1515); Ostalo
ru: Рекомендуемый размер направляющей или рельса для запуска модели ракеты: Стержень 1/4 дюйма (6 мм); Стержень 1/8 дюйма (3 мм); Стержень 3/16 дюйма (5 мм); Направляющая (1010); Направляющая (1515); Другое
sl-SI: Priporočena velikost lansirne palice ali tirnice za modelno raketo: Palica 1/4 in (6 mm); Palica 1/8 in (3 mm); Palica 3/16 in (5 mm); Izstrelitvena tirnica (1010); Izstrelitvena tirnica (1515); Drugo
fi: Suositeltu laukaisutangon tai -kiskon koko: 1/4 tuuman (6 mm) laukaisutanko; 1/8 tuuman (3 mm) laukaisutanko; 3/16 tuuman (5 mm) laukaisutanko; Laukaisukisko (1010); Laukaisukisko (1515); Muu
zh-TW: 模型火箭建議發射桿或發射軌尺寸: 1/4 吋 (6 mm) 發射桿; 1/8 吋 (3 mm) 發射桿; 3/16 吋 (5 mm) 發射桿; 發射導軌 (1010); 發射導軌 (1515); 其他
it: Dimensione consigliata di asta o rotaia di lancio per razzomodellismo: Asta da 1/4 in (6 mm); Asta da 1/8 in (3 mm); Asta da 3/16 in (5 mm); Rotaia di lancio (1010); Rotaia di lancio (1515); Altro
sv: Rekommenderad avfyrningsstång eller skena för modellraket: 1/4 tum (6 mm) stång; 1/8 tum (3 mm) stång; 3/16 tum (5 mm) stång; Avfyrningsräls (1010); Avfyrningsräls (1515); Annan
tr: Model roket için önerilen fırlatma çubuğu veya ray boyutu: 1/4 inç (6 mm) çubuk; 1/8 inç (3 mm) çubuk; 3/16 inç (5 mm) çubuk; Fırlatma rayı (1010); Fırlatma rayı (1515); Diğer
lt-LT: Rekomenduojamas modelinės raketos paleidimo strypo arba bėgio dydis: 1/4 col. (6 mm) strypas; 1/8 col. (3 mm) strypas; 3/16 col. (5 mm) strypas; Paleidimo bėgelis (1010); Paleidimo bėgelis (1515); Kita
ro-RO: Dimensiunea recomandată a tijei sau șinei de lansare pentru racheta de modelism: Tijă de 1/4 in (6 mm); Tijă de 1/8 in (3 mm); Tijă de 3/16 in (5 mm); Șină de lansare (1010); Șină de lansare (1515); Altele
en: Model rocket recommended launch rod or rail size: 1/4 in (6 mm) rod; 1/8 in (3 mm) rod; 3/16 in (5 mm) rod; Launch rail (1010); Launch rail (1515); Other
da: Anbefalet størrelse af affyringsstang eller skinne for modelraket: 1/4" (6 mm) stang; 1/8" (3 mm) stang; 3/16" (5 mm) stang; Affyringsrampe (1010); Affyringsskinne (1515); Andet
nb: Anbefalt oppskytingsstang- eller skinnestørrelse for modellrakett: 1/4 tommers (6 mm) stang; 1/8 tommers (3 mm) stang; 3/16 tommers (5 mm) stang; Utkytningsskinne (1010); Utskytningsskinne (1515); Annet
sk-SK: Odporúčaná veľkosť odpaľovacej rampy alebo koľají pre modelárske rakety: 1/4" (6 mm) tyč; 1/8" (3 mm) tyč; 3/16" (5 mm) tyč; Vodiaca lišta (1010); Vodiaca lišta (1515); Iné
pl: Zalecany rozmiar pręta lub szyny startowej rakiety modelarskiej: Pręt 1/4 cala (6 mm); Pręt 1/8 cala (3 mm); Pręt 3/16 cala (5 mm); Szyna startowa (1010); Szyna startowa (1515); Inne
pt-PT: Dimensões recomendadas para a haste ou trilho de lançamento de foguetes modelo: Haste de 1/4 pol. (6 mm); Haste de 1/8 pol. (3 mm); Haste de 3/16 pol. (5 mm); Calha de lançamento (1010); Calha de lançamento (1515); Outro
ja: 推奨ロケットモデルLaunch棒またはレールのサイズ: 1/4インチ (6 mm) ロッド; 1/8インチ (3 mm) ロッド; 3/16インチ (5 mm) ロッド; ランチレール (1010); ランチレール (1515); その他
th: ขนาดของก้านส่งหรือรางปล่อยจรวดที่แนะนำสำหรับจรวดจำลอง: ก้าน 1/4 นิ้ว (6 มม.); ก้าน 1/8 นิ้ว (3 มม.); ก้าน 3/16 นิ้ว (5 มม.); รางปล่อยจรวด (1010); รางปล่อยจรวด (1515); อื่นๆ
de: Empfohlene Größe der Startrampe bzw. -schiene für Modellraketen: 1/4 Zoll (6 mm) Leitstab; 1/8 Zoll (3 mm) Leitstab; 3/16 Zoll (5 mm) Leitstab; Startschiene (1010); Startschiene (1515); Sonstige
pt-BR: Foguete de modelismo tamanho recomendado da haste ou trilho de lançamento: Haste de 1/4 pol. (6 mm); Haste de 1/8 pol. (3 mm); Haste de 3/16 pol. (5 mm); Trilho de lançamento (1010); Trilho de lançamento (1515); Outro
cs: Doporučená velikost odpalovací tyče nebo kolejnice pro model rakety: 1/4" (6 mm) vodicí tyč; 1/8" (3 mm) vodicí tyč; 3/16" (5 mm) vodicí tyč; Vodicí kolejnice (1010); Vodicí kolejnice (1515); Jiné
el: Συνιστώμενο μέγεθος ράβδου ή ράγας εκτόξευσης για το μοντέλο πυραύλου: Ράβδος 1/4 in (6 mm); Ράβδος 1/8 in (3 mm); Ράβδος 3/16 in (5 mm); Ράγα εκτόξευσης (1010); Ράγα εκτόξευσης (1515); Άλλο
bg-BG: Препоръчителен размер на стартов прът или релса за моделна ракета: 1/4 инча (6 мм) пръчка; 1/8 инча (3 мм) пръчка; 3/16 инча (5 мм) пръчка; Стартова релса (1010); Стартова релса (1515); Друго
hu: Modellrakéta kilövőrúdjának vagy -sínjének ajánlott mérete: 1/4 in (6 mm) indítórúd; 1/8 in (3 mm) indítórúd; 3/16 in (5 mm) indítórúd; Indítósín (1010); Indítósín (1515); Egyéb
zh-CN: 模型火箭推荐发射杆或导轨尺寸: 1/4 英寸（6 毫米）发射杆; 1/8 英寸（3 毫米）发射杆; 3/16 英寸（5 毫米）发射杆; 发射导轨（1010）; 发射导轨（1515）; 其他